Utah statutes.
76-10-1001.   Definitions.
For the purpose of this part:
(1)  "Forged trademark," "forged trade name," "forged trade device," and
"counterfeited trademark," "counterfeited trade name," "counterfeited trade
device," or their equivalents, as used in this part, include every alteration
or imitation of any trademark, trade name, or trade device so resembling the
original as to be likely to deceive.
(2)  "Trademark" or "trade name" or "trade device," as used in this part,
includes every trademark registrable with the Division of Corporations and
Commercial Code.
